Massachusetts, session 194th, S2380.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 7E of chapter 90 of the General Laws, is hereby amended by inserting, in line 68, 
after the word “registrar”, the following words:- , (vii) on authorized motor vehicles owned, 
used, or contracted by the Massachusetts Department of Transportation established by section 2 
of chapter 6C, in connection with maintenance or construction activities in highway work zones, 
and by the authority of a permit issued by the registrar.